Tennessee, session 114, SB1798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-704(a), is amended by deleting
"one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000)" wherever it appears in subdivisions (2),
(3), and (4), and substituting instead "two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to tax years beginning on or after that date.
SB1798
011200
- 1 -